src/resource/test_HU.aff
NAME Magyar Ispell helyesírási szótár
LANG hu_HU
HOME http://magyarispell.sourceforge.net
VERSION Magyar 1.0-RC1
SET ISO8859-2
TRY íóúÍÓÚtaeslzánorhgkiédmyőpvöbucfjüűxwqTAESLZÁNORHGKIÉDMYŐPVÖBUCFJÜŰXWQ-.
COMPOUNDMIN 2
COMPOUNDFLAG Y
COMPOUNDWORD 2 y
COMPOUNDFORBIDFLAG %
COMPOUNDSYLLABLE 6 aáeéiíoóöőuúüű
SYLLABLENUM klmc
COMPOUNDFIRST v
COMPOUNDLAST x
FORBIDDENWORD w
ONLYROOT u
ACCENT áéíóöőúüű aeiooouuu
CHECKNUM
WORDCHARS -.§%°0123456789
HU_KOTOHANGZO Z

# replacenment table for
# - multicharacter suggestions
# - well-sorted suggestions

SFX U Y 1
SFX U   0    ét           [^ao]                     [POSSESSEE]+[ACC]

SFX O Y 1
SFX O   0    tam          [^tóúőűk]                 [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_1] H

SFX H Y 1
SFX H   0    tam          [^tóúőűk]                 [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_1] U

PFX Z Y 1
PFX Z   0    ki           .                         ki[PREF]
